District of Columbia statutes.
16-4605.02

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(e), 56 DCR 1572

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-378 added this section.